munduruku.lexc
! Bachelor Thesis of Evangelos Filippidis
! Lexicon entries for the lexc interface

! Multicharacter Symbols used to describe the analysis form of the words
Multichar_Symbols NUMBER=SING|PERSON=1+ NUMBER=SING|PERSON=2+ CLUSIVITY=Ex|NUMBER=PLUR|PERSON=1+ CLUSIVITY=In|NUMBER=PLUR|PERSON=1+ NUMBER=PLUR|PERSON=2+ NUMBER=SING|PERSON=3+


! Root lexicon containing all the lexicons
LEXICON ROOT
	Argument_Index_Bound_Perf;
	Argument_Index_Bound_Imperf;
	Argument_Index_Free;
	Possessor_Index_Bound;
	Lex_Perf;
	Lex_Imperf;
	Perf_root;
	Imperf_root;
	Perf;
	Argument_Index_Bound_Noun;
	Poss_mark_R1;
	Poss_mark_R2;
	Noun;
	
! possessor indexes that have the clitics in their continuation class	
LEXICON Possessor_Index_Bound
NUMBER=SING|PERSON=1+:o		Clitic;
NUMBER=SING|PERSON=2+:e		Clitic;
CLUSIVITY=Ex|NUMBER=PLUR|PERSON=1+:oce	Clitic;
CLUSIVITY=In|NUMBER=PLUR|PERSON=1+:wuy	Clitic;
NUMBER=PLUR|PERSON=2+:ey	Clitic;
NUMBER=SING|PERSON=3+:je	Clitic;

! this lexicon lists all known clitics
LEXICON Clitic
webe	#;
ase	#;
keg̃	#;
wi	#;
buxim	#;
dag̃	#;
teg̃	#;
kay	#;
xe	#;
weju	#;
kug̃	#;
jeje	#;
tog̃	#;
pibun	#;
wap	#;
em	#;
bima	#;
buje	#;
buye	#;

! these argument indexes can occur on their own
LEXICON Argument_Index_Free
NUMBER=SING|PERSON=1+:õn	#;
NUMBER=SING|PERSON=2+:ẽn	#;
CLUSIVITY=Ex|NUMBER=PLUR|PERSON=1+:oceju	#;
CLUSIVITY=In|NUMBER=PLUR|PERSON=1+:wuyju	#;
NUMBER=PLUR|PERSON=2+:eyju	#;

! argument indexes that are bound to the verbs in the perfective aspect
LEXICON Argument_Index_Bound_Perf
NUMBER=SING|PERSON=1+:o		Lex_Perf;
NUMBER=SING|PERSON=2+:e		Lex_Perf;
CLUSIVITY=Ex|NUMBER=PLUR|PERSON=1+:oce	Lex_Perf;
CLUSIVITY=In|NUMBER=PLUR|PERSON=1+:a	Lex_Perf;
NUMBER=PLUR|PERSON=2+:epe	Lex_Perf;
NUMBER=SING|PERSON=3+:o'	Lex_Perf;

! argument indexes that are bound to the verbs in the imperfective aspect
LEXICON Argument_Index_Bound_Imperf
NUMBER=SING|PERSON=1+:o		Lex_Imperf;
NUMBER=SING|PERSON=2+:e		Lex_Imperf;
CLUSIVITY=Ex|NUMBER=PLUR|PERSON=1+:oce	Lex_Imperf;
CLUSIVITY=In|NUMBER=PLUR|PERSON=1+:a	Lex_Imperf;
NUMBER=PLUR|PERSON=2+:epe	Lex_Imperf;
NUMBER=SING|PERSON=3+:o'	Lex_Imperf;

! adding an the imperfective tag in the analysis form while keeping the surface form empty, same for perfective
LEXICON Lex_Imperf
Imperfective+:	Imperf_root;
	
LEXICON Lex_Perf
Perfective+:	Perf_root;

! lexicon that lists the verbs for the imperfective aspect
LEXICON Imperf_root
(to_kill):aoka	#;
(to_hunt):orok	#;
(be_warm):xip	#;
(to_cut):akat	#;
(to_fear):parara	#;
(to_walk):cu	#;
(to_see):jo	#;
(to_bathe):ajok	#;
(to_pass):kap	#;
(to_say):'e	#;

! lexicon that lists the verbs for the perfective and has the Perf lexicon in the continuation class
LEXICON Perf_root
(to_kill):aoka	Perf;
(to_hunt):orok	Perf;
(be_warm):xip	Perf;
(to_cut):akat	Perf;
(to_fear):parara	Perf;
(to_walk):cu	Perf;
(to_see):jo	Perf;
(to_bathe):ajok	Perf;
(to_pass):kap	Perf;
(to_say):'e	Perf;

! placeholder symbol added for intermediate form for perfective aspect
LEXICON Perf
:M	#;

! argument indexes for nouns
LEXICON Argument_Index_Bound_Noun
NUMBER=SING|PERSON=1+:o		Poss_mark_R1;
NUMBER=SING|PERSON=2+:e		Poss_mark_R1;
CLUSIVITY=Ex|NUMBER=PLUR|PERSON=1+:oce	Poss_mark_R1;
CLUSIVITY=In|NUMBER=PLUR|PERSON=1+:wuy	Poss_mark_R1;
NUMBER=PLUR|PERSON=2+:ey	Poss_mark_R1;
NUMBER=SING|PERSON=3.coref+:je	Poss_mark_R1;

! adding placeholder symbol "X" if R1 contiguity
LEXICON Poss_mark_R1
R1+:X	Noun;

! adding placeholder symbol "Y" if R2 contiguity
LEXICON Poss_mark_R2
R2+:Y	Noun;

! lexicon with nouns that work for most of the grammar
LEXICON Noun
mother:xi	#;
leg:dao	#;
arrow:op	#;
finger:bu  #;
voice:a'õ   #;
arm:bay #;
leaf:dup #;
